Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7213
Violation; penalty.

If, after the hearing, the director finds a health carrier has violated the Quality Assessment and Improvement Act, the director shall reduce his or her findings to writing and shall issue and cause to be served upon the health carrier charged with the violation a copy of the findings and an order requiring the health carrier to cease and desist from engaging in the violation and the director may order any one or more of the following:

(1) Payment of a monetary penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of thirty thousand dollars, unless the violation was committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard of the Quality Assessment and Improvement Act, in which case the penalty shall not be more than fifteen thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

(2) Suspension or revocation of the health carrier's certificate of authority if the health carrier knew or reasonably should have known it was in violation of the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 63.